Hawaii, session 2025, HB1418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 206N, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§206N-     Wireless telecommunications carriers; backup power. (a)  As a condition for any permit under section 206N-6 for a wireless telecommunications carrier to construct, reconstruct, or alter a telecommunications facility, the telecommunications facility shall maintain emergency backup power for a minimum of twelve hours. (b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the public utilities commission's authority to regulate wireless telecommunications carriers under chapter 269 or to require emergency backup power of greater duration. (c) For purposes of this section, "telecommunications carrier" has the same meaning as in section 269‑1." SECTION 2.  Chapter 269, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§269-    Wireless telecommunications carriers; backup power.  (a)  As a condition for any certificate of public convenience and necessity under section 269-7.5 for a wireless telecommunications carrier the application shall demonstrate that the carrier either: (1)  Owns, operates, or maintains infrastructure used for the provision of telecommunications services in the state and has the capability to maintain emergency backup power for a minimum of twelve hours; or (2)  Does not own, operate, or maintain infrastructure used for the provision of telecommunications services in the state and obtains network access from a separate utility that has established its capability to maintain emergency backup power for a minimum of twelve hours. (b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the public utilities commission's authority to regulate wireless telecommunications carriers under this chapter or to require emergency backup power of greater duration." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________